Utah statutes.
4-37-401.   Certificate of registration required to import aquatic animals for aquaculture or fee fishing facilities.

(1)  A person may not import aquatic animals classified as controlled species by rules of the Wildlife Board into the state for use in aquaculture or fee fishing facilities without first obtaining a certificate of registration from the department.

(2)  The department shall:

(a)  coordinate with the Division of Wildlife Resources in determining which species the holder may import into the state; and

(b)  specify those species on the certificate of registration.

(3)  A person may not import species into the state that are not listed on the certificate of registration.

